Hawaii, session 2026, HB2412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $80,950,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the eighth representative district, as follows: 1.   Kohala high school Design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for new gym, ground and site improvements; equipment and appurtenances. Design                           $1,000 Construction                $36,998,000 Equipment                        $1,000 Total funding                    $37,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 2.   Waimea elementary school Design and construction for site improvements, including parking lot improvements. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                     $2,500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 3.   Lapakahi state historical park Construction and equipment and appurtenances for restroom facility improvements. Construction                   $199,000 Equipment                        $1,000 Total funding                       $200,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources. 4.   Puakea Bay trail Plans and design for Puakea Bay trail repairs and improvements. Plans                          $125,000 Design                          $25,000 Total funding                       $150,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources. 5.   Pololū trailhead Design and construction for trailhead improvements, including parking lot improvements, new lookout construction, and interpretive signage design and manufacturing. Design                           $1,000 Construction                 $1,999,000 Total funding                     $2,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources. 6.   South Kohala district courthouse Design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for new courthouse facility; ground and site improvements; equipment and appurtenances, and infrastructure, including providing separate waiting areas, accessible restrooms, secure holding areas, and expanded office space to accommodate judicial staff and client services with energy-efficient systems to support sustainable operations. Design                           $1,000 Construction                $29,998,000 Equipment                        $1,000 Total funding                    $30,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the judiciary. 7.   Waimea emergency shelter Design and construction for an emergency shelter; provided that no funds shall be expended unless matched on a dollar-for-dollar basis by funds from the county of Hawaii. Design                           $1,000 Construction                 $7,499,000 Total funding                     $7,500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the Hawaii emergency management agency. 8.   Waikoloa second access road intersection Plans and design for a new access road intersection with Queen Kaahumanu highway. Plans                            $1,000 Design                       $1,599,000 Total funding                     $1,600,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. SECTION 2.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________